Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB400.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 102 of the act of June 3, 1937 (P.L.1333, No.320), known as the Pennsylvania Election Code, is amended by adding a definition to read:12345678910111213141516171819202122232425262728 Section 102. Definitions.--The following words, when used in this act, shall have the following meanings, unless otherwise clearly apparent from the context:* * *(z.7) The words "unenrolled elector" shall mean a person who is registered to vote within an election district having selected "none or no affiliation" or "independent" in regard to a political party on their Pennsylvania voter registration application . Section 2. Sections 702, 802 and 902 of the act are amended to read:Section 702. Qualifications of Electors at Primaries.--(a) The qualifications of electors entitled to vote at primaries shall be the same as the qualifications of electors entitled to vote at elections within the election district where the primary is held[, provided that no elector who is not registered and enrolled as a member of a political party, in accordance with the provisions of this act, shall be permitted to vote the ballot of such party or any other party ballot at any primary].(b) Unenrolled electors shall be permitted to vote in primary elections in accordance with the procedures specified in sections 902.1 and 1231.Section 802. Only Enrolled Electors to [Vote at Primaries or] Hold Party Offices.--No person who is not registered and enrolled as a member of a political party shall be entitled to [vote at any primary of such party or to] be elected or serve as a party officer, or a member or officer of any party committee, or delegate or alternate delegate to any party convention.Section 902. Candidates to Be Nominated and Party Officers to Be Elected at Primaries.--All candidates of political 20250SB0400PN0712 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 parties, as defined in section 801 of this act, for the offices of President of the United States, United States Senator, Representative in Congress and for all other elective public offices within this State, except that of presidential electors, shall be nominated, and party delegates and alternate delegates, committeemen and officers who, under the provisions of Article VIII of this act or under the party rules, are required to be elected by the party electors, shall be elected at primaries held in accordance with the provisions of this act[, except as otherwise provided in this act. In the years when candidates for the office of President of the United States are to be nominated, every registered and enrolled member of a political party shall have the opportunity at the Spring primary in such years to vote his preference for one person to be the candidate of his political party for President.]. In a primary election conducted in this Commonwealth, all unenrolled electors shall have the opportunity to vote in accordance with the procedures specified in section 902.1.Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 902.1. Procedure for Unenrolled Electors to Cast Primary Ballots.--(a) Upon confirming an unenrolled elector's status as a registered elector, the elections officer shall ask the unenrolled elector in which political party's primary the unenrolled elector desires to vote, and the elections officer upon reply shall record the unenrolled elector's selection upon the unenrolled elector's certificate and for the purpose of that ballot only shall be deemed enrolled in that party. The unenrolled elector shall not sign the voter's certificate until the elections officer has recorded the unenrolled elector's desired political party on the certificate.20250SB0400PN0712 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (b) The ballot provided to an unenrolled elector shall not include a selection for a political party officer or a member or officer of a party committee.(c) The Secretary of the Commonwealth shall provide guidance to the county boards of elections on how to prepare and distribute voter registration materials and the requisite ballot information and printing requirements regarding unenrolled electors voting in a primary election.(d) The county boards of elections shall prepare cards of instruction and related materials in accordance with the requirements of section 1202 and this section for unenrolled electors voting in a primary election. The county boards of elections shall prepare and deliver the official ballots and related materials governing the participation of unenrolled electors in a primary election to the judges of election in the election districts in accordance with section 1204 and this section.(e) The Secretary of the Commonwealth in collaboration with the county boards of elections shall provide information and training to assist poll workers in understanding the requirements of this act regarding the participation of unenrolled electors in a primary election.(f) The Secretary of the Commonwealth in collaboration with the county boards of elections shall adjust absentee and mail-in ballots and the applications for absentee and mail-in ballots for unenrolled electors participating in a specific primary election in accordance with the provisions of this act.(g) The Department of State of the Commonwealth shall modify the SURE system to ensure an unenrolled elector's ballot choice in a specific primary election is properly documented and the 20250SB0400PN0712 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 voter's unenrolled status is retained in subsequent primary elections and not identified with a particular party affiliation based on which political party's primary the unenrolled elector selected in a prior primary election.Section 4. Section 1210(d) of the act is amended to read:Section 1210. Manner of Applying to Vote; Persons Entitled to Vote; Voter's Certificates; Entries to Be Made in District Register; Numbered Lists of Voters; Challenges.--* * *(d) No person, except a qualified elector who is in actual military or naval service under a requisition of the President of the United States or by the authority of this Commonwealth, and who votes under the provisions of Article XIII of this act, shall be entitled or permitted to vote at any primary or election at any polling place outside the election district in which [he] the person resides, nor shall [he] the person be permitted to vote in the election district in which [he] the person resides, unless [he] the person has been personally registered as an elector and [his] the person's registration card appears in the district register of such election district, except by order of the court of common pleas as provided in this act, and any person, although personally registered as an elector, may be challenged by any qualified elector, election officer, overseer, or watcher at any primary or election as to [his] identity, as to [his] continued residence in the election district or as to any alleged violation of the provisions of section 1210 of this act, and if challenged as to identity or residence, [he] the person shall produce at least one qualified elector of the election district as a witness, who shall make affidavit of [his] the person's identity or continued residence in the election district: Provided, however, That no person 20250SB0400PN0712 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 shall be entitled to vote as a member of a party at any primary, unless [he] the person is:(1) registered and enrolled as a member of such party upon the district register, which enrollment shall be conclusive as to [his] party membership and shall not be subject to challenge on the day of the primary[.]; or(2) an unenrolled elector, in which case the person may vote for the candidates of the party of the unenrolled elector's choice in accordance with the procedures specified in section 902.1. The unenrolled elector's choice of party at one primary election shall not preclude the unenrolled elector from choosing a different party in a subsequent primary election.* * *Section 5. This act shall apply to the next municipal or general primary election held no less than 180 days after the effective date of this section.Section 6. This act shall take effect immediately.20250SB0400PN0712 - 6 - 1234567891011121314151617